Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-567.04
Revenue bonds; negotiable instruments; authorized investments.

All bonds issued under the authority of sections 46-567.01 to 46-567.06 are hereby declared to be negotiable instruments under the law merchant and are hereby made securities in which all state and municipal officers and bodies, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations and societies, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all administrators, executors, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest any funds, including capital, belonging to them or within their control; and the bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and shall be received by any municipal officer or agency for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of this state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

Laws 1951, c. 151, § 17, p. 615.